Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202526-113
Domestic abuse protection order; referee.

The court may by rule or order refer or assign all matters regarding a domestic abuse protection order to a referee for findings and recommendations.

Laws 2025, LB80, § 13.